Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVII Special Proceedings
Condemnation

416.010.
Institution
of condemnation action by railroad.

When any company authorized
to construct a railroad is unable to contract with the owner of any land or
material necessary for its use for the purpose thereof, it shall institute
a condemnation action pursuant to the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

History.

835: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 119.

416.015.
Alternate procedure. [Repealed.]

416.020.
Appointment of commissioners — Evaluation of property — Commissioners’ report. [Repealed.]

416.030.
Process issued when report filed. [Repealed.]

416.040.
Confirmation of report as to parties not excepting. [Repealed.]

416.050.
Trial of exceptions — Judgment. [Repealed.]

416.060.
Appeal to circuit court. [Repealed.]

416.070.
Transfer of case to circuit court when title to land is involved. [Repealed.]

416.080.
When company entitled to possession of condemned property. [Repealed.]

416.090.
Railroad
right-of-way cannot be condemned.

No part of the right-of-way
of any railroad company, or any interest or easement therein, shall be taken
by any condemnation proceedings, or without the consent of the railroad company,
for the use or occupancy of any part of such right-of-way on, over and along
the right-of-way longitudinally, by any telegraph, telephone, electric light,
power or other wire company, with its poles, cables, wires, conduits or other
fixtures. Nothing in this section is intended to prevent any such wire company
from obtaining the right to cross the right-of-way of a railroad company,
under existing laws, in such manner as not to interfere with the ordinary
use or ordinary travel and traffic of the railroad.

History.

840a.

416.100.
Condemnation
by county judge/executive for road purposes.

When any county judge/executive
desires to condemn land under the authority of KRS

178.110

, the county judge/executive
shall proceed pursuant to the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

History.

4302: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 120; 1978, ch. 384, § 521, effective June 17, 1978.

416.110.
Condemnation
by fiscal court for road purposes.

When any fiscal court desires to condemn land under the authority of KRS

178.120

, it shall adopt a resolution ordering the condemnation of the required land. The resolution shall set forth the facts contemplated by KRS

178.120

, give a general description of the land, and the name of the owner if known, and shall direct the county attorney to institute the proceedings.

The county attorney shall file the petition for condemnation in the Circuit Court in the name of the county, and shall attach to the petition as an exhibit a certified copy of the resolution of the fiscal court. The resolution shall be prima facie evidence of the public use and necessity for the condemnation. Thereafter the proceedings shall be as provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

History.

4302a-2 to 4302a-12: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 121; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 418, effective January 2, 1978.

416.115.
Alternative
method of condemnation for roads and bridges and for public purposes. [Repealed.]

416.120.
Condemnation
for park purposes in cities of first class. [Repealed.]

416.130.
Dam
and electric companies may make surveys and condemn property.

Every corporation organized for the purpose of constructing, or empowered to construct, a dam in any stream in this state for the purpose of improving navigation or developing, distributing and selling water power or electricity, and every corporation authorized under the laws of this state to conduct the business of producing and supplying electricity for the purpose of light, heat or power, may cause examinations and surveys to be made for its proposed dams, reservoirs, ponds, locks, bridges, power stations, roads, conduits and transmission lines, as well as the land that may be overflowed by the erection of any dam or other structure, and for such purposes may, by its officers, agents or servants, enter from time to time upon any lands or waters for the purpose of making such surveys or examinations, subject to liability for actual damage done. Before entering upon any land for such purposes, the corporation shall deposit with the clerk of the county in which the property is located, a bond to the Commonwealth in a penal sum fixed by the county judge/executive at not more than double the last assessed valuation of the property to be surveyed or examined, conditioned to indemnify all persons for actual damages sustained on account of making any examination or survey. When the location of the dam or other structure, and the land that may be overflowed by the erection of the dam, is determined, the corporation shall cause a survey and map to be made of the land to be taken and entered upon, which map shall be signed by the president and secretary and filed in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the land shown on the map is situated.

When any such corporation cannot, by agreement with the owner, acquire the property rights, privileges or easements needed for any of the uses or purposes referred to in subsection (1) of this section, the corporation may condemn such property, property rights, privileges or easements in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky. Any corporation constructing or maintaining such dam shall be liable for any damages resulting from overflowing any property, public or private.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 52; 1976, ch. 140, § 123; 1978, ch. 384, § 522, effective June 17, 1978.

416.140.
Companies
transmitting or selling electricity, gas, or gasoline may acquire rights
for lines and appliances along roads and streams.

Subject to the provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section, any person authorized under the laws of this state to conduct the business of producing or supplying water, electricity, gas or gasoline for purposes of light, heat, domestic use or power, or who is engaged in the business of the transmission or sale of water, electricity, gas or gasoline for such purposes, the aforesaid businesses being for a public purpose, may construct and maintain transmission or distribution lines, including placing and maintenance of pipes, poles, wires, crossarms and all other equipment incident thereto, for use in the transmission and sale of such water, electricity, gas or gasoline under, on, along or over any right-of-way used as a state highway, county road, public way or dedicated road outside the limits of a city, and over, under or across any of the waters of this state outside the limits of a city, and may construct and maintain along any right-of-way used for purposes of such state highway or county road all erections and appliances that are necessary to transform, convert and apply such water, electricity, gas or gasoline to the public purposes of lighting, heat, domestic use or power and to distribute and deliver it to the consumers.

The fixtures of the company shall not interfere with, obstruct or endanger the travel on and along the highway or road, nor obstruct the navigation of the waters, and the location of all transmission lines and other appliances shall be subject to the reasonable direction and regulation of the authorities having control of the highways, roads and waters through and over which the lines are constructed or proposed to be constructed.

Before any persons named in subsection (1) of this section shall proceed to place his wires, poles or other appliances on or over any part of the right-of-way of a state highway, he shall first obtain from the Department of Highways a permit so to do. Any poles, wires or other obstructions, heretofore or hereafter placed along, under, on or over any state highway that are found by the Department of Highways to be unreasonably interfering in any way with the convenient, safe and continuous use and maintenance of such highway shall, upon thirty (30) days’ notice to the person or his chief agent, by the Department of Highways, be removed or relocated by such person at his own expense, except as otherwise provided in KRS

177.035

. Whenever an order of the Department of Highways requires such removal or change in the location of any telephone, telegraph, electric light or other poles, signboards, fences, gasoline tanks and pumps, gas, water, sewerage, oil or other pipelines, or other similar construction or obstructions from the right-of-way of a state highway, and the owner thereof fails to remove or change the same at his own expense, except as otherwise provided in KRS

177.035

, to conform to the order within the time stated in the notice, the Department of Highways shall proceed to cause the obstruction to be removed; the expense thereby incurred shall be paid out of any money available therefor, and shall be charged against the owner and levied and collected and paid into the State Treasury as provided by law.

History.

1599c-1, 1599c-3: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 213, § 1; 1972, ch. 195, § 17; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1).

416.150.
Condemnation
by telephone companies.

Any telephone company desiring
to condemn a right-of-way under the authority of subsection (2) of KRS

278.540

shall proceed pursuant to the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

History.

4679c-3, 4679d-2: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 124.

416.160.
Summons issued; jury called; challenges; oath; compensation of jury and officers.
[Repealed.]

416.170.
Assessment of damages.
[Repealed.]

416.180.
Verdict and judgment; form of.
[Repealed.]

416.190.
Mortgage on property sought to be condemned; procedure. [Repealed.]

416.200.
Appeals. [Repealed.]

416.210.
Right of burial association or corporation to condemn land for cemetery — Governmental approval needed — Procedure.

Any burial association or corporation may, with the approval of the appropriate city, county, urban-county, consolidated local government, or charter county legislative body, condemn land by first recording, in the county clerk’s office of the county where the land lies, a resolution that it needs the land to furnish a burial site for the public. It may condemn a sufficient roadway to have access to the land, not wider than one hundred (100) feet. It may also condemn enough land, not exceeding five (5) acres, adjacent to any land used for a cemetery for a chapel site. If the building of any state highway requires a change in the entrance to any cemetery, the burial association or corporation may condemn any adjacent land, not wider than one hundred (100) feet for the new entrance. The condemnation procedure shall be in the Circuit Court of the county pursuant to the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky. This section shall not permit condemnation of more than forty (40) acres at any one time.

History.

199a-8, 199a-9: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 141, § 3; 1976, ch. 140, § 125; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 419, effective January 2, 1978; 2006, ch. 44, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.

416.220.
Owner
of real estate providing public sleeping accommodations and meals —
Condemnation for water supply — Furnishing of water to owner of property
condemned.

The owner of real estate serving the public, providing sleeping accommodations and meals, when pure water is not available in adequate quantities, shall have the right to condemn on the banks of any navigable stream a tract of land not more than twenty (20) feet square and above the high water mark for a pumping station site and a right-of-way for a pipeline from said site to the deep water of the navigable stream and from said pumping station site to the point on the owner’s real estate where the water is desired for use. The said property owner may condemn a right-of-way for an electric power line over the most direct course to the pumping station site. In the event the owner of such real estate finds it more desirable to make connections with the water system of a municipality or a water supply line leading from a navigable stream to the municipality or other source of supply, then said real estate owner may, at his option, condemn a right-of-way for a pipeline from said city water system or water supply line or other source of supply to the point on the owner’s real estate where the water is desired for use, including such area as may be required to install and maintain pumps and meters for said water system and an electric line to conduct power to said pump with necessary electric control lines or apparatus. The owner of property condemning right-of-way for a water line under this section, may agree to supply the subject owner a quantity of water in lieu of cash compensation for the easement, and such agreement to supply water to the subject property owner shall not be construed to place a burden on the condemning party to supply water service to others or meet the obligation of a public utility to render water service.

The provisions of KRS

381.660

,

381.670

, and

381.680

shall be complied with except that when the pumping station site and pipeline are located on cliff land and do not cross any tillable land the pumps and pipe may be located above ground.

The procedure for condemnation shall be that set forth in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 219; 1954, ch. 47; 1976, ch. 140, § 126.

416.230.
Condemnation
for oil or gas pipelines and related facilities — Petition.

A corporation, partnership or
individual seeking to condemn lands and material or the use and occupation
of lands, under the provisions of KRS

278.502

, may file a verified petition
in the office of the Circuit Court clerk of the county in which all or the
greater portion of the land and material is located. The petition shall state
that it is filed under the provisions of KRS

278.502

and shall be conducted
pursuant to the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 186, § 2; 1976, ch. 140, § 127.

416.240.
Appointment of commissioners; duties; report. [Repealed.]

416.250.
Process against owner. [Repealed.]

416.260.
Answer or other pleading by owner. [Repealed.]

416.270.
Examination of report of commissioners; correction of report; judgment if right to condemn is not questioned; appeal; judgment where right to condemn is questioned; right of immediate possession. [Repealed.]

416.280.
Appeal from judgment authorizing petitioner to take possession; appeal from judgment dismissing petition; right to possession pending appeal. [Repealed.]

416.290.
Custody of money paid into court. [Repealed.]

416.300.
Determination of rights of conflicting claimants to land. [Repealed.]

416.310.
Application of Rule of Civil Procedure. [Repealed.]

416.320.
Damages allowed for market value reduction of entire tract. [Repealed.]

416.330.
Limitation
on right of ingress and egress for pipeline.

Where the pipeline is reasonably
accessible over the easement sought to be condemned, ingress and egress to
and from the pipeline and appurtenances shall be limited to the easement itself.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 208, § 1, effective June 19, 1952.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, Prac. & Proc. Forms, 5th Ed., Report of Commissioners in Condemnation Proceeding, Form 354.04.

416.340.
Water
associations may condemn property.

Any water association supplying
water to no less than 100 customers, which has been formed under the provisions
of KRS Chapter 273, may exercise the power of eminent domain in accordance
with the provisions of the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 213, § 1; 1976, ch. 140, § 128.

416.350.
Right
of condemnation by owner to gain ingress or egress to public road.

The owner of any tract or parcel of land on which his residence is located, who has no means of ingress or egress to any public road or highway, may acquire by condemnation pursuant to the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky a convenient right-of-way in order to attend courts and elections and discharge other duties required of him by law; such right-of-way shall not exceed in width thirty (30) feet over the lands intervening and lying between such tract or parcel of land and the public road nearest or most convenient thereto.

The right of condemnation conferred in subsection (1) of this section shall not exist in any of the following situations:

Where the current owner or any of his predecessors in title purchased a tract or parcel of land having no means of ingress or egress to a public road or highway;

Where the current owner or any of his predecessors in title sold a part of a tract or parcel of land, leaving the part retained without any means of ingress or egress to a public road or highway; or

Where the current owner or any of his predecessors in title has had a part of his land taken by condemnation, the part not taken has no means of ingress or egress to a public road or highway, and the current owner or any of his predecessors in title has been compensated, by reason of the condemnation, for such loss of ingress or egress to a public road or highway.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 228, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.

416.360.
Acquisition
of real property necessary to locate or relocate public utility facilities
by public agency with power of eminent domain for public improvement projects.

Any public agency which has the right to exercise the power of eminent domain for street, road, highway, or other public improvement projects may acquire in its own name, by condemnation or otherwise, any real property that is necessary to locate or relocate any public utility facilities as required for the construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, or maintenance of the project. The public agency and the affected public utility shall first enter into an agreement for this acquisition. The agreement shall include all relevant terms and conditions of the acquisition, including a description of the real property to be acquired. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a public agency which acquires any real property for public utility facilities pursuant to this section shall, pursuant to the terms of the agreement, convey to the affected utility any real property so acquired.

The right of a public utility to exercise the power of eminent domain shall not in any way be affected by this section. Nothing in this section shall empower the condemnation of property owned by the Commonwealth of Kentucky or in which the Commonwealth of Kentucky has an interest.

For purposes of this section, “real property” includes any estate, easement, fixtures, or other interests or rights in and to real property.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 227, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Eminent domain, KRS

416.010

et seq.

416.410.
Definitions for KRS 416.420 to 416.530. [Repealed.]

416.420.
Right to condemn. [Repealed.]

416.430.
Filing petition. [Repealed.]

416.440.
Appointment, report of commissioners. [Repealed.]

416.450.
Issuing summons. [Repealed.]

416.460.
Filing answer. [Repealed.]

416.470.
Trial by court on pleadings — Interloctory judgment. [Repealed.]

416.480.
Trial of exceptions to interlocutory judgment — Questions as to compensation to be tried by jury — Appeals. [Repealed.]

416.490.
Money paid into court. [Repealed.]

416.500.
Conflicting claimants to condemned land. [Repealed.]

416.510.
Proceedings governed by civil rules. [Repealed.]

416.520.
Standard for determining compensation. [Repealed.]

416.530.
Citation. [Repealed.]